Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6101
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-6101 to 44-6121 shall be known and may be cited as the Insurers Demutualization Act.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 41;

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 4.